Colorado, session 2026A, HB1319.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add part 3 to article
13.5 of title 8 as follows:
PART 3
RIGHT TO BE OUT AT WORK
8-13.5-301. Short title.
THE SHORT TITLE OF THIS PART 3 IS THE "RIGHT TO BE OUT AT
WORK ACT".
8-13.5-302. Legislative declaration.
(1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT:
-3- HB26-1319

(a) COLORADO LAW, SPECIFICALLY SECTION 24-34-402, PROHIBITS
DISCRIMINATORY OR UNFAIR EMPLOYMENT PRACTICES AGAINST
INDIVIDUALS ON THE BASIS OF SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY,
OR GENDER EXPRESSION; AND
(b) EVERY EMPLOYEE IN COLORADO HAS A RIGHT TO BE OPEN
ABOUT THEIR SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, AND GENDER
EXPRESSION WITHOUT FEAR OF DISCRIMINATION OR RETALIATION.
(2) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY ALSO FINDS THAT, DESPITE EXISTING
LAWS PROTECTING LGBTQ+ EMPLOYEES, MANY SUCH EMPLOYEES:
(a) CONTINUE TO EXPERIENCE DISPROPORTIONATE WORKPLACE
HARASSMENT, UNEQUAL BENEFITS, AND ADMINISTRATIVE BARRIERS TO
SELF-IDENTIFICATION;
(b) REMAIN UNAWARE OF THEIR RIGHTS;
(c) FACE RETALIATION FOR EXERCISING THEIR RIGHTS; AND
(d) ARE DENIED ADEQUATE TOOLS TO REMEDY DISCRIMINATORY
PRACTICES.
(3) THEREFORE, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY DECLARES THAT:
(a) AFFIRMATIVELY ESTABLISHING A RIGHT TO BE OUT AT WORK
IN COLORADO WILL CLARIFY EXISTING PROTECTIONS, CREATE ACCESSIBLE
REMEDIES, AND PROMOTE EQUITABLE AND INCLUSIVE WORKPLACES IN THE
PUBLIC AND PRIVATE SECTORS; AND
(b) WITH THIS PART 3, THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY INTENDS TO:
(I) CODIFY THE RIGHT OF EVERY EMPLOYEE IN COLORADO TO BE
OPEN ABOUT THEIR SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, OR GENDER
EXPRESSION WITHOUT FEAR OF DISCRIMINATION OR RETALIATION;
(II) REQUIRE EMPLOYERS TO RECOGNIZE EMPLOYEES'
SELF-IDENTIFIED NAMES, PRONOUNS, AND PERSONAL TITLES;
-4- HB26-1319

(III) ENSURE ACCESS TO INCLUSIVE FACILITIES AND EMPLOYMENT
BENEFITS; AND
(IV) STRENGTHEN ENFORCEMENT AND ACCOUNTABILITY BY
AUTHORIZING THE DEPARTMENT TO RECEIVE, INVESTIGATE, AND
ADJUDICATE COMPLAINTS ARISING UNDER THIS PART 3.
8-13.5-303. Definitions.
AS USED IN THIS PART 3, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES:
(1) "ADVERSE EMPLOYMENT ACTION" MEANS DISCHARGE,
DEMOTION, CONTRACT NONRENEWAL, DISCIPLINE, DENIAL OF PROMOTION,
HARASSMENT, OR DISCRIMINATORY TREATMENT RELATED TO
EMPLOYMENT CONDITIONS OR BENEFITS.
(2) "DEPARTMENT" MEANS THE DEPARTMENT OF LABOR AND
EMPLOYMENT.
(3) "EMPLOYEE" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL EMPLOYED BY AN
EMPLOYER IN THE STATE.
(4) "EMPLOYER" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL, A PARTNERSHIP, AN
ASSOCIATION, A CORPORATION, OR A PUBLIC ENTITY EMPLOYING ONE OR
MORE INDIVIDUALS WITHIN THE STATE.
(5) "GENDER EXPRESSION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-34-301 (9).
(6) "GENDER IDENTITY" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
24-34-301 (10).
(7) "LGBTQ+" MEANS LESBIAN, GAY, BISEXUAL, TRANSGENDER
OR TRANSITIONING, OR QUEER OR A GENDER IDENTITY THAT IS DIFFERENT
FROM CISGENDER AND HETEROSEXUAL NORMS.
(8) "PUBLIC EMPLOYER" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN SECTION
-5- HB26-1319

29-33-103 (6).
(9) "SEXUAL ORIENTATION" HAS THE MEANING SET FORTH IN
SECTION 24-34-301 (24).
(10) "TRANSITION" OR "TRANSITIONING" MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL'S
ADOPTION OF OUTWARD OR PHYSICAL CHARACTERISTICS THAT MATCH
THEIR GENDER IDENTITY RATHER THAN THE CHARACTERISTICS THAT ARE
ASSOCIATED WITH AN INDIVIDUAL'S SEX AS REGISTERED AT BIRTH.
(11) "TRANSITION PLAN" MEANS A WRITTEN TRANSITION PLAN
DESCRIBED IN SECTION 8-13.5-309.
8-13.5-304. Right to be out at work - retaliation prohibited.
(1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL NOT SUBJECT AN EMPLOYEE TO AN
ADVERSE EMPLOYMENT ACTION IN RESPONSE TO THE EMPLOYEE'S
DISCLOSURE OF, OR COMMUNICATION ABOUT, THE EMPLOYEE'S SEXUAL
ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, OR GENDER EXPRESSION OR TO THE
EMPLOYEE'S STATUS AS A TRANSGENDER, NONBINARY, OR TRANSITIONING
INDIVIDUAL.
(2) AN EMPLOYER SHALL NOT RETALIATE AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE
FOR THE EMPLOYEE'S SUPPORT OF, ASSISTANCE TO, OR ADVOCACY FOR A
COWORKER, STUDENT, OR CLIENT WHO EXERCISES THE INDIVIDUAL'S RIGHT
TO NONDISCRIMINATION, INCLUDING BY REFERRING TO AN INDIVIDUAL BY
THEIR CHOSEN NAMES, PRONOUNS, OR PERSONAL TITLES.
8-13.5-305. Right to self-identify.
(1) AN EMPLOYEE MAY DETERMINE THE NAMES, PRONOUNS, AND
PERSONAL TITLES THAT ARE USED TO REFER TO THE EMPLOYEE IN THE
WORKPLACE.
(2) UPON NOTIFICATION BY AN EMPLOYEE, AN EMPLOYER SHALL
UPDATE ALL INTERNAL AND PUBLIC-FACING RECORDS, INCLUDING
-6- HB26-1319

NAMEPLATES, DIRECTORIES, AND DIGITAL SYSTEMS, TO REFLECT THE
EMPLOYEE'S CHOSEN NAMES, PRONOUNS, AND PERSONAL TITLES WITHOUT
UNNECESSARY DELAY.
(3) IF AN EMPLOYEE CHOOSES A NAME OTHER THAN THE
EMPLOYEE'S LEGAL NAME FOR THE PURPOSES OF SUBSECTION (1) OF THIS
SECTION, THE EMPLOYER SHALL USE THE EMPLOYEE'S LEGAL NAME ONLY
WHERE SUCH USE IS REQUIRED BY LAW.
8-13.5-306. Gender-inclusive dress code.
AN EMPLOYER'S WORKPLACE DRESS CODE MAY NOT IMPOSE
DIFFERENT REQUIREMENTS ON THE BASIS OF AN INDIVIDUAL'S SEXUAL
ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, OR GENDER EXPRESSION.
8-13.5-307. Access to inclusive facilities.
(1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL ALLOW EACH EMPLOYEE ACCESS TO A
RESTROOM AND CHANGING FACILITY THAT CORRESPONDS WITH THE
EMPLOYEE'S GENDER IDENTITY.
(2) AN EMPLOYER THAT OPERATES A PUBLIC BUILDING SHALL
ENSURE THAT THE BUILDING INCLUDES AT LEAST ONE RESTROOM THAT IS:
(a) COMPLIANT WITH THE FEDERAL "AMERICANS WITH
DISABILITIES ACT OF 1990", 42 U.S.C. SEC. 12101 ET SEQ., AND ITS
RELATED AMENDMENTS AND IMPLEMENTING REGULATIONS; AND
(b) ACCESSIBLE TO ALL INDIVIDUALS, REGARDLESS OF THE
INDIVIDUAL'S SEXUAL ORIENTATION, GENDER IDENTITY, OR GENDER
EXPRESSION.
(3) AN EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE ADEQUATE PRIVATE SPACES FOR
NURSING OR PUMPING, WHICH SPACES ARE NOT RESTROOMS AND ARE
AVAILABLE TO ALL PARENTS REGARDLESS OF THEIR SEXUAL ORIENTATION,
GENDER IDENTITY, OR GENDER EXPRESSION.
-7- HB26-1319

8-13.5-308. Inclusive employment benefits - model policy
language - audits.
(1) AN EMPLOYER SHALL ENSURE EQUAL ACCESS TO EMPLOYMENT
BENEFITS WITHOUT REGARD TO AN EMPLOYEE'S SEXUAL ORIENTATION,
GENDER IDENTITY, OR GENDER EXPRESSION.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT MODEL POLICY LANGUAGE
AND CONDUCT REGULAR AUDITS TO ENSURE COMPLIANCE WITH THIS
SECTION.
8-13.5-309. Transition plans for public employees - policies
required - voluntary participation by employees.
(1) Transition plan policy required. EVERY PUBLIC EMPLOYER
SHALL PROVIDE AN EMPLOYEE-INITIATED PROCESS FOR THE DEVELOPMENT
AND IMPLEMENTATION OF A WRITTEN TRANSITION PLAN FOR
TRANSGENDER OR TRANSITIONING EMPLOYEES.
(2) Voluntary participation.
(a) PARTICIPATION IN A TRANSITION PLAN BY AN EMPLOYEE IS
VOLUNTARY.
(b) A TRANSITION PLAN MAY BE INITIATED ONLY AT THE REQUEST
OF AN EMPLOYEE.
(c) AN EMPLOYER SHALL NOT IMPOSE ANY PENALTY OR TAKE ANY
ADVERSE EMPLOYMENT ACTION AGAINST AN EMPLOYEE FOR
DISCONTINUING A TRANSITION PLAN AT ANY TIME, FOR ANY REASON.
(3) Good faith collaboration. UPON REQUEST BY AN EMPLOYEE,
A PUBLIC EMPLOYER SHALL PROMPTLY ENGAGE IN GOOD FAITH
DISCUSSIONS WITH THE EMPLOYEE, AND, IF APPLICABLE, THE EMPLOYEE'S
DESIGNATED UNION REPRESENTATIVE, TO DEVELOP A TRANSITION PLAN.
A PUBLIC EMPLOYER SHALL ENSURE THAT SUCH DISCUSSIONS ARE
-8- HB26-1319

COLLABORATIVE, CONFIDENTIAL, AND CONDUCTED IN A MANNER THAT
AFFIRMS THE DIGNITY AND PRIVACY OF THE EMPLOYEE.
(4) Employee-centered scope.
(a) A TRANSITION PLAN MUST ADDRESS ONLY THOSE ASPECTS OF
TRANSITIONING THAT THE EMPLOYEE CHOOSES TO RAISE.
(b) AN EMPLOYER SHALL NOT REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE TO DISCUSS
OR DISCLOSE ANY MATTER THAT THE EMPLOYEE DOES NOT WISH TO
ADDRESS.
(c) AN EMPLOYER SHALL NOT REQUIRE AN EMPLOYEE TO CREATE
OR MAINTAIN A TRANSITION PLAN AS A CONDITION OF EMPLOYMENT.
(5) Plan contents. AS MUTUALLY AGREED UPON BY AN EMPLOYEE
AND AN EMPLOYER, A TRANSITION PLAN MAY INCLUDE CONSIDERATION OF:
(a) INTERNAL AND EXTERNAL COMMUNICATIONS REGARDING THE
EMPLOYEE'S TRANSITION;
(b) SCHEDULING AND APPROVAL OF ANY ABSENCES RELATED TO
THE EMPLOYEE'S TRANSITION;
(c) PROCEDURES FOR UPDATING AND USING THE EMPLOYEE'S
CHOSEN NAME, PRONOUNS, AND PERSONAL TITLES IN ALL EMPLOYMENT
CONTEXTS; AND
(d) TRAINING OR EDUCATIONAL OPPORTUNITIES FOR COWORKERS,
STUDENTS, OR OTHER STAKEHOLDERS TO PROMOTE UNDERSTANDING OF
THE EXPERIENCES IN THE WORKPLACE OF TRANSGENDER INDIVIDUALS AND
INDIVIDUALS WHO ARE TRANSITIONING.
(6) Confidentiality. ALL RECORDS AND COMMUNICATIONS
RELATED TO A TRANSITION PLAN ARE CONFIDENTIAL, AND AN EMPLOYER
SHALL MAINTAIN THE RECORDS AND COMMUNICATIONS SEPARATELY FROM
STANDARD PERSONNEL FILES UNLESS DISCLOSURE IS REQUIRED BY LAW OR
-9- HB26-1319

AUTHORIZED IN WRITING BY THE EMPLOYEE.
8-13.5-310. Transition plans - private employers.
AN EMPLOYEE OF A PRIVATE EMPLOYER MAY REQUEST TO
COLLABORATE WITH THE EMPLOYER TO DEVELOP AND IMPLEMENT A
TRANSITION PLAN, AS DESCRIBED IN SECTION 8-13.5-309.
8-13.5-311. Use of leave time.
AN EMPLOYER SHALL PERMIT AN EMPLOYEE TO USE THE
EMPLOYEE'S AVAILABLE SICK OR PERSONAL LEAVE TIME FOR THE PURPOSE
OF CHANGING THE EMPLOYEE'S LEGAL NAME OR OBTAINING
GENDER-AFFIRMING MEDICAL CARE, INCLUDING RECOVERY TIME.
8-13.5-312. Professional development and training.
(1) A PUBLIC EMPLOYER SHALL PROVIDE ANNUAL TRAINING TO ALL
EMPLOYEES REGARDING INCLUSIVE WORKPLACES AND SUPPORT FOR
LGBTQ+ EMPLOYEES.
(2) THE DEPARTMENT, IN CONSULTATION WITH LABOR UNIONS AND
LGBTQ+ ADVOCACY ORGANIZATIONS, SHALL DEVELOP AND MAKE
AVAILABLE TRAINING MATERIALS FOR THE PURPOSES OF THIS SECTION TO
ENSURE CONSISTENCY AND ACCESSIBILITY STATEWIDE.
8-13.5-313. Enforcement and remedies.
(1) THE DEPARTMENT MAY:
(a) RECEIVE AND INVESTIGATE COMPLAINTS ALLEGING VIOLATIONS
OF THIS PART 3;
(b) ISSUE FINDINGS AND ORDERS TO PROVIDE RELIEF; AND
(c) REFER CASES INVOLVING EGREGIOUS OR WILLFUL VIOLATIONS
TO THE COLORADO CIVIL RIGHTS DIVISION OR TO THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(2) THE TYPES OF RELIEF THAT THE DEPARTMENT MAY ORDER
PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (1)(b) OF THIS SECTION INCLUDE:
-10- HB26-1319

(a) A CEASE-AND-DESIST ORDER;
(b) BACK PAY;
(c) FRONT PAY;
(d) HIRING OF AN EMPLOYEE, WITH BACK PAY;
(e) REINSTATEMENT OF AN EMPLOYEE, WITH BACK PAY;
(f) EXPUNGEMENT OF ANY DISCIPLINARY ACTIONS RELATED TO THE
VIOLATION;
(g) UPGRADING OR PROMOTING OF AN EMPLOYEE; AND
(h) A FINE IN AN AMOUNT NOT TO EXCEED FIVE THOUSAND
DOLLARS FOR EACH VIOLATION. THE DEPARTMENT SHALL TRANSFER
MONEY COLLECTED AS FINES PURSUANT TO THIS SUBSECTION (2)(h) TO
THE COMPLAINANT.
8-13.5-314. Applicability.
(1) THIS PART 3 SHALL NOT BE CONSTRUED TO ABROGATE OR
DIMINISH:
(a) THE RIGHTS, PRIVILEGES, OR REMEDIES OF AN EMPLOYEE
UNDER A COLLECTIVE BARGAINING AGREEMENT OR AN EMPLOYMENT
CONTRACT; OR
(b) AN EMPLOYER'S OBLIGATION TO COMPLY WITH A COLLECTIVE
BARGAINING AGREEMENT OR AN EMPLOYER POLICY, AS APPLICABLE, THAT
PROVIDES GREATER PROTECTIONS, SAFEGUARDS, OR REMEDIES FOR
LGBTQ+ EMPLOYEES THAN THE PROTECTIONS, SAFEGUARDS, OR
REMEDIES DESCRIBED IN THIS PART 3.
8-13.5-315. Rules.
THE DEPARTMENT SHALL ADOPT RULES TO IMPLEMENT AND
ENFORCE THIS PART 3, INCLUDING RULES ESTABLISHING PROCEDURES FOR
FILING, INVESTIGATING, AND RESOLVING COMPLAINTS THAT THE
-11- HB26-1319

DEPARTMENT RECEIVES CONCERNING THIS PART 3. IN ADOPTING RULES AS
DESCRIBED IN THIS SECTION, THE DEPARTMENT SHALL CONSULT WITH
LGBTQ+ SUPPORT GROUPS AND LABOR UNIONS.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date. This act
takes effect June 1, 2028; except that, if a referendum petition is filed
pursuant to section 1 (3) of article V of the state constitution against this
act or an item, section, or part of this act within the ninety-day period
after final adjournment of the general assembly, then the act, item,
section, or part will not take effect unless approved by the people at the
general election to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take
effect June 1, 2028.
-12- HB26-1319